District of Columbia statutes.
10-503.23

Suspension of prohibitions against use — Authorization generally — Authorization of Capitol Police Board.

In the absence from Washington of either of the officers designated in § 10-503.22, the authority therein given to suspend certain prohibitions of this part shall devolve upon the other, and in the absence from Washington of both it shall devolve upon the Capitol Police Board; provided, that notwithstanding the provisions of §§ 10-503.17 and 10-503.22, the Capitol Police Board is hereby authorized to grant the Mayor of the District of Columbia authority to permit the use of Louisiana Avenue for any of the purposes prohibited by said § 10-503.17.

July 31, 1946, 60 Stat. 719, ch. 707, § 12
This section is referenced in § 10-503.17.
1981 Ed., § 9-125.
1973 Ed., § 9-129.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.